Georgia statutes. TITLE 13 Contracts
Article 2 Statute of Frauds

13-5-30.
Agreements required to be in writing.

To make the following obligations binding on the promisor, the promise must be in writing and signed by the party to be charged therewith or some person lawfully authorized by him or her:

A promise by a conservator, guardian, personal representative, or trustee to answer damages out of his or her own estate;

A promise to answer for the debt, default, or miscarriage of another;

Any agreement made upon consideration of marriage;

Any contract for sale of lands, or any interest in, or concerning lands;

Any agreement that is not to be performed within one year from the making thereof;

Any promise to revive a debt barred by a statute of limitation; and

Any commitment to lend money.

Any agreement to modify, alter, cancel, repeal, revoke, release, or rescind a promise, agreement, contract, or commitment provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section must be in writing and signed by all parties to such agreement; provided, however, that if the party against whom enforcement of such agreement under this subsection is sought admits in a pleading, in testimony, or otherwise in court that the agreement was made, then such agreement is enforceable if valid in all other respects.

History.
29 Car. II, c. 3, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 1127; Ga. L. 1851-52, p. 243, § 1; Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 233, § 25; Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 238, § 1; Code 1863, § 1952; Code 1868, § 1940; Code 1873, § 1950; Ga. L. 1880-81, p. 62, § 1; Code 1882, § 1950; Civil Code 1895, § 2693; Civil Code 1910, § 3222; Code 1933, § 20-401; Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 403, § 1; Ga. L. 2018, p. 155, § 2-2/HB 190; Ga. L. 2019, p. 782, § 1/SB 37; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 2-13/HB 865.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, inserted “or her” at the end of the introductory paragraph and near the end of paragraph (1) and deleted “, except marriage articles as provided in Article 3 of Chapter 3 of Title 19” following “marriage” at the end of paragraph (3).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, designated the existing provisions of this Code section as subsection (a) and added subsection (b).

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “a conservator, guardian, personal representative,” for “an executor, administrator, guardian,” in paragraph (a)(1) and deleted a comma following “otherwise in court” in subsection (b).

Parties to contract must be identified. —

Memorandum relied upon to take sale at auction out of operation of statute of frauds must in some way indicate or show who are parties to contract; not only who is purchaser, but who is seller. Pierce v. Rush, 210 Ga. 718, 82 S.E.2d 649, 1954 Ga. LEXIS 420 (1954).

Any designation of vendors, vendees, lessors, or lessees, which clearly discloses the parties, is sufficient.

Maxwell v. Tucker, 118 Ga. App. 695, 165 S.E.2d 459, 1968 Ga. App. LEXIS 1503 (1968).

Writing within meaning of statute of frauds must bind party sought to be charged.

Houston v. Jefferson Std. Life Ins. Co., 119 Ga. App. 729, 168 S.E.2d 843, 1969 Ga. App. LEXIS 1223 (1969); Industrial Welding & Tool Supplies, Inc. v. CIT Corp., 157 Ga. App. 611, 278 S.E.2d 50, 1981 Ga. App. LEXIS 1933 (1981).

Parties to such agreement must know or reasonably believe boundary is disputed or unascertained. —

Coterminous proprietors must know or reasonably believe boundary is disputed or unascertained before the proprietors can orally agree to or acquiesce in new line. Otherwise, their agreement, whether express or implied, runs afoul of paragraph (4) of the statute of frauds. United States v. Williams, 441 F.2d 637, 1971 U.S. App. LEXIS 10941 (5th Cir. 1971).

Part payment of purchase money, accompanied by possession, removes transaction from statute. —

While payment of part of purchase money is not alone such part performance as will take case out of statute of frauds, if accompanied by possession it will amount to such part performance. Aldridge v. Whaley, 218 Ga. 611, 130 S.E.2d 124, 1963 Ga. LEXIS 275 (1963).

Partial payment of the purchase money accompanied by possession of the property may remove an oral contract from the operation of paragraph (4) of the statute of frauds. Stephens v. Trotter, 213 Ga. App. 596, 445 S.E.2d 359, 1994 Ga. App. LEXIS 686 (1994).

When partnership rented property from a partner, made annual payments on a loan secured by the property and paid the loan off, the evidence was sufficient to raise a jury question as to whether the parol agreement of the parties should have been removed from the statute of frauds and whether there was partial performance accompanied by possession. Singleton v. Terry, 262 Ga. App. 151, 584 S.E.2d 613, 2003 Ga. App. LEXIS 635 (2003), cert. denied, No. S03C1641, 2003 Ga. LEXIS 959 (Ga. Nov. 10, 2003), cert. denied, No. S03C1679, 2003 Ga. LEXIS 960 (Ga. Nov. 10, 2003).

Although there was no purchase money resulting trust created under O.C.G.A. §§53-12-90,53-12-91, and53-12-92, a decedent’s mother was entitled to an equity interest in property of the deceased daughter because a constructive trust was established under former O.C.G.A. §53-12-93(a). Moreover, there was evidence of a gift of land under O.C.G.A. §23-2-132, as an exception to the statute of frauds under O.C.G.A. §13-5-30, in that the mother lived on the property, made valuable improvements, and paid meritorious consideration. Oliver v. 4708 Old Highgate Entry, No. 1:07-cv-2117-ODE, 2009 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 73002 (N.D. Ga. Apr. 21, 2009), amended, No. 1:07-CV-02117-ODE, 2009 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 83302 (N.D. Ga. May 1, 2009).

Part performance as will obviate operation of paragraph (3) of statute of frauds. —

Part performance relied on to take case out of statute of frauds must have been done strictly with reference to contract; if referable to anything else it is not available. Taylor v. Boles, 191 Ga. 591, 13 S.E.2d 352, 1941 Ga. LEXIS 334 (1941).

Part performance established. —

Buyer orally agreed to build a bridge for the seller in exchange for 10 acres of land, and began working on the bridge before a written contract was prepared, evidence permitted the jury to find that the buyer’s part performance was sufficient to avoid the Georgia statute of frauds, O.C.G.A. §13-5-30. Investment Props. Co. v. Watson, 278 Ga. App. 81, 628 S.E.2d 155, 2006 Ga. App. LEXIS 255 (2006).

Defendant was properly convicted of felony theft by taking in violation of O.C.G.A. §16-8-2 for failing to transmit to a law firm payments the defendant received for indigent defense work because the statute of frauds, O.C.G.A. §13-5-30(5), was not implicated; the firm performed the firm’s part of the parties’ agreement in paying the defendant a salary, providing rent-free office space, and offering administrative support, among other things. Clarke v. State, 317 Ga. App. 471, 731 S.E.2d 100, 2012 Ga. App. LEXIS 720 (2012), cert. denied, No. S13C0033, 2013 Ga. LEXIS 306 (Ga. Mar. 25, 2013).

Part performance not established. —

Sellers were properly granted summary judgment in an action filed by a buyer arising out of an oral land sales contract given that: (1) no evidence of the buyer’s partial performance existed sufficient to remove the contract from the statute of frauds; (2) a wetlands study and interest rate negotiation were not a part of the contract; and (3) a later negotiated contract was an arm’s length transaction, the price of which was negotiated at the time, and hence, did not relate to the original contract. Payne v. Warren, 282 Ga. App. 524, 639 S.E.2d 528, 2006 Ga. App. LEXIS 1452 (2006), cert. denied, No. S07C0524, 2007 Ga. LEXIS 287 (Ga. Mar. 26, 2007).

Part performance as will obviate operation of paragraph (4) of statute of frauds. —

When defendant’s possession was by virtue of contract of sale, and improvements of property were made with knowledge and approval of plaintiffs and in connection with contract of sale, such possession and improvements were sufficient to remove cause from prohibition of paragraph (4) of statute of frauds, and to bring it within provisions of paragraph (3) of former Code 1933, § 20-402 (see O.C.G.A. §13-5-31). Higdon v. Dixon, 203 Ga. 67, 45 S.E.2d 423, 1947 Ga. LEXIS 572 (1947).

While contract involving any interest in land must be in writing to bind parties, paragraph (4) of statute of frauds does not extend to cases when there has been such part performance of contract as would render it fraud of party refusing to comply, if court did not compel performance. Kinney v. Youngblood, 216 Ga. 354, 116 S.E.2d 608, 1960 Ga. LEXIS 471 (1960).

Oral contract for sale of land will be recognized and enforced when there has been such part performance of contract as would render it fraud of party refusing to comply, if court did not compel performance. Osborne v. Martin, 136 Ga. App. 86, 220 S.E.2d 19, 1975 Ga. App. LEXIS 1256 (1975).

When a party orally stated to a landlord that the party had assumed a lease for the remainder of the lease’s renewal term and had accepted condemnation proceeds awarded to the leasehold interest, the party’s performance was sufficient to remove the contract from the statute of frauds and the resulting implied contract was sufficient to support an action on a distress warrant. Powell v. Estate of Austin, 218 Ga. App. 446, 462 S.E.2d 378, 1995 Ga. App. LEXIS 771 (1995), cert. denied, No. S96C0012, 1995 Ga. LEXIS 1229 (Ga. Dec. 1, 1995).

Part performance as will obviate operation of paragraph (5) of statute of frauds. —

Performance of services under oral contract of employment for part of term is not such part performance as renders it a fraud upon party performing for employer to refuse to comply, by discharge of that party before expiration of term. This is true, notwithstanding person performing services, after person executed contract, and began to render services under the contract, refused offer of employment elsewhere. Morris v. Virginia-Carolina Chem. Corp., 48 Ga. App. 702, 173 S.E. 486, 1934 Ga. App. LEXIS 166 (1934).

Performance of services under oral employment contract within statute for part of term is not such part performance as renders it fraud upon party performing for employer to refuse to comply, by discharge of that party before expiration of term. Utica Tool Co. v. Mitchell, 135 Ga. App. 635, 218 S.E.2d 650, 1975 Ga. App. LEXIS 1765 (1975).

When alleged agreement is oral, with no set termination date agreed upon, in order for agreement to become enforceable there must be such part performance of agreeent as would render it fraud of party refusing to comply. Moorman Ingram Tractors, Inc. v. Harrington Mfg. Co., 146 Ga. App. 398, 247 S.E.2d 159, 1978 Ga. App. LEXIS 2374 (1978).

Because there was some evidence of either full or part performance sufficient to take the oral contract out of the statute of frauds, the trial court did not err in denying defendant’s motion to dismiss on basis of paragraph (5) of O.C.G.A. §13-5-30. Haehn v. Alheit, 212 Ga. App. 252, 441 S.E.2d 529, 1994 Ga. App. LEXIS 172 (1994).

13-5-31.
Agreements enforceable without writing.

The provisions of Code Section 13-5-30 do not extend to the following cases:

When the contract has been fully executed;

Where there has been performance on one side, accepted by the other in accordance with the contract;

Where there has been such part performance of the contract as would render it a fraud of the party refusing to comply if the court did not compel a performance.

History.
29 Car. II, c. 3, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 1127; Ga. L. 1853-54, p. 58, § 1; Code 1863, § 1953; Code 1868, § 1941; Code 1873, § 1951; Code 1882, § 1951; Civil Code 1895, § 2694; Civil Code 1910, § 3223; Code 1933, § 20-402.

Section applicable only where performance expressly or impliedly accepted. —

Estoppel to deny existence of valid contract under former Code 1933, § 20-401 (see O.C.G.A. §13-5-30) provided for in former Code 1933, § 20-402 (see O.C.G.A. §13-5-31) was available only where performance made by one side had been expressly or impliedly accepted by the other. Nowell v. Mayor of Monroe, 177 Ga. 648, 171 S.E. 136, 1933 Ga. LEXIS 382 (1933).

Part Performance

Part performance required to obviate statute of frauds must be substantial and essential to contract. —

See Norman v. Nash, 102 Ga. App. 508, 116 S.E.2d 624, 1960 Ga. App. LEXIS 665 (1960); Forest Servs., Inc. v. Fidelity & Cas. Co., 120 Ga. App. 600, 171 S.E.2d 743, 1969 Ga. App. LEXIS 874 (1969); Hudson v. Venture Indus., Inc., 147 Ga. App. 31, 248 S.E.2d 9, 1978 Ga. App. LEXIS 2603 (1978), aff'd, 243 Ga. 116, 252 S.E.2d 606, 1979 Ga. LEXIS 825 (1979); Metzgar v. Reserve Ins. Co., 149 Ga. App. 404, 254 S.E.2d 517, 1979 Ga. App. LEXIS 1872 (1979); Zager v. Brown, 242 Ga. App. 427, 530 S.E.2d 50, 2000 Ga. App. LEXIS 209 (2000), cert. denied, No. S00C1055, 2000 Ga. LEXIS 554 (Ga. June 30, 2000).

Part performance which will take contract out of operation of statute of frauds

is such as is, within terms of agreement, an essential part of the contract, and as such is essential to performance of contract.
Bentley v. Smith, 3 Ga. App. 242, 59 S.E. 720, 1907 Ga. App. LEXIS 610 (1907);
Lewis v. Southern Realty Inv. Corp., 42 Ga. App. 171, 155 S.E. 369, 1930 Ga. App. LEXIS 278 (1930);
Alexander-Seewald Co. v. Marett, 53 Ga. App. 314, 185 S.E. 589, 1936 Ga. App. LEXIS 77 (1936); Dameron v. Liberty Nat'l Life Ins. Co., 56 Ga. App. 257, 192 S.E. 446, 1937 Ga. App. LEXIS 329 (1937).

Part performance is something substantial, and is generally essential to performance of contract. Hotel Candler, Inc. v. Candler, 198 Ga. 339, 31 S.E.2d 693, 1944 Ga. LEXIS 408 (1944).

Acts which are merely preparatory or preliminary to the performance of a contract are not enough, but performance which is substantial and essential to the contract and results in benefit to one party and detriment to the other obviates the statute of frauds. Vitner v. Funk, 182 Ga. App. 39, 354 S.E.2d 666, 1987 Ga. App. LEXIS 1608 (1987).

Question of fact remained as to whether the parties performance of the terms outlined in the memorandum were sufficient to save those terms from the statute of frauds. Gryder v. Conley, 352 Ga. App. 891, 836 S.E.2d 120, 2019 Ga. App. LEXIS 661 (2019).

Part performance refers to performance of contract provisions, not acts in reliance on contract. —

Act of part performance done must be in performance of and in pursuance of parol contract. The contract is void at law, and is only enforced because courts of equity have, for prevention of fraud, set up certain defined exceptions to the statute. Simonton, Jones & Hatcher v. Liverpool, London & Globe Ins. Co., 51 Ga. 76, 1874 Ga. LEXIS 54 (1874).

Part performance referred to in paragraph (3) must be part performance of contract; and doing by either party of some independent act, not part of the contract, does not become part performance because doer of act was led so to act by belief or understanding that parol contract would be performed by other party. Giradot v. Giradot, 172 Ga. 230, 157 S.E. 282, 1931 Ga. LEXIS 58 (1931); Hotel Candler, Inc. v. Candler, 198 Ga. 339, 31 S.E.2d 693, 1944 Ga. LEXIS 408 (1944).

Act done to constitute performance, must be in performance of and pursuant to parol contract.
Alexander-Seewald Co. v. Marett, 53 Ga. App. 314, 185 S.E. 589, 1936 Ga. App. LEXIS 77 (1936).

Part performance to contractor for parol sale of lands to relief must be part performance of terms of contract. Doing of independent thing, even though act would not have been done but for contract, is not sufficient. Neely v. Sheppard, 185 Ga. 771, 196 S.E. 452, 1938 Ga. LEXIS 518 (1938).

Part performance with which paragraph (3) deals is part performance of contract. Doing of an independent thing, even though act would not have been but for the contract, is not sufficient. Smith v. Davidson, 198 Ga. 231, 31 S.E.2d 477, 1944 Ga. LEXIS 392 (1944).

Part performance which will take contract out of statute of fraud is performance of essential part of the contract; doing of an independent act, even though it would not have been done but for the contract, is insufficient. Wells v. H.W. Lay & Co., 78 Ga. App. 364, 50 S.E.2d 755, 1948 Ga. App. LEXIS 740 (1948).

Part performance which will remove contract from statute of frauds refers to performance of provisions of contract and not to acts done by one because of one’s belief in and reliance on agreement. Spiegel v. Hays, 103 Ga. App. 293, 119 S.E.2d 123, 1961 Ga. App. LEXIS 930 (1961).

Performance of acts independent of and not required by terms of contract will not be sufficient to constitute part performance so as to bring it within exception of paragraph (3). Moon v. Stone Mt. Mem. Ass'n, 223 Ga. 696, 157 S.E.2d 461, 1967 Ga. LEXIS 662 (1967).

Part performance of parol contract for sale of land which constitutes valid exception to statute of frauds must be part performance of the contract, and doing by either party of some independent act, not part of the contract, does not become part performance, because doer of act was led so to act by belief that parol contract would be performed by other party. Ellis v. Savannah Bank & Trust Co., 237 Ga. 612, 229 S.E.2d 417, 1976 Ga. LEXIS 1323 (1976).

Part performance must be of contract sued upon, not of another materially different contract. —

Part performance by seller of another contract, materially different from contract sued upon, is not part performance of contract sued upon and therefore will not operate to remove contract sued from statute of frauds. Curry Grocery Co. v. Brown, 30 Ga. App. 711, 119 S.E. 217, 1923 Ga. App. LEXIS 638 (1923).

Part performance, to obviate statute of frauds, must benefit one party and be detrimental to the other.

See Norman v. Nash, 102 Ga. App. 508, 116 S.E.2d 624, 1960 Ga. App. LEXIS 665 (1960); Forest Servs., Inc. v. Fidelity & Cas. Co., 120 Ga. App. 600, 171 S.E.2d 743, 1969 Ga. App. LEXIS 874 (1969); Hudson v. Venture Indus., Inc., 147 Ga. App. 31, 248 S.E.2d 9, 1978 Ga. App. LEXIS 2603 (1978), aff'd, 243 Ga. 116, 252 S.E.2d 606, 1979 Ga. LEXIS 825 (1979); Metzgar v. Reserve Ins. Co., 149 Ga. App. 404, 254 S.E.2d 517, 1979 Ga. App. LEXIS 1872 (1979); Smith Serv. Oil Co. v. Parker, 250 Ga. App. 270, 549 S.E.2d 485, 2001 Ga. App. LEXIS 600 (2001).

Part performance relied upon must have not only resulted in benefit to promisor, but in loss or injury to promisee.

In such case, uncertainty of parol evidence is to be endured rather than allow promisor to take unjust and inequitable advantage of promisee. Dameron v. Liberty Nat'l Life Ins. Co., 56 Ga. App. 257, 192 S.E. 446, 1937 Ga. App. LEXIS 329 (1937).

Part performance of oral contract of employment which is void under statute of frauds, which has resulted in benefit to employer and injury to employee will operate to exempt contract from requirements of statute. White v. Simplex Radio Co., 61 Ga. App. 157, 5 S.E.2d 922, 1939 Ga. App. LEXIS 242 (1939).

When loss may have been voluntarily incurred by party in preparing to perform parol contract, but there was no evidence showing that such acts were of any benefit to other party so as to estop that party from asserting statute of frauds, acts were not in part performance of obligations arising under such contract or of an essential part thereof, such as would take contract out of statute of frauds. Cofer v. Wofford Oil Co., 85 Ga. App. 444, 69 S.E.2d 674, 1952 Ga. App. LEXIS 757 (1952).

Mere circumstance that verbal agreement has been in part performed without benefit or detriment to parties can afford no reason, such as to control action of any court, whether of law or equity, for holding parties bound to perform what remains executory. Tompkins v. Tompkins, 88 Ga. App. 563, 76 S.E.2d 819, 1953 Ga. App. LEXIS 1133 (1953).

While oral contract within statute of frauds may be taken out by part performance thereof where one party to contract performs some act essential to performance of the contract which results in loss to that party and benefit to other party thereto, mere fact that one party enters upon performance of agreement which shows no loss to that party or benefit to the other party, is not sufficient to take contract out of operation of statute. Forest Servs., Inc. v. Fidelity & Cas. Co., 120 Ga. App. 600, 171 S.E.2d 743, 1969 Ga. App. LEXIS 874 (1969); Freeman v. Baker, 147 Ga. App. 168, 248 S.E.2d 298, 1978 Ga. App. LEXIS 2833 (1978).

Part performance shown. —

Because there was some evidence of either full or part performance sufficient to take the oral contract out of the statute of frauds, the trial court did not err in denying defendant’s motion to dismiss on the basis of O.C.G.A. §13-5-30(5). Haehn v. Alheit, 212 Ga. App. 252, 441 S.E.2d 529, 1994 Ga. App. LEXIS 172 (1994).

Trial court’s grant of summary judgment to an employer and the employer’s officer in a breach of contract claim by a former employee was error as the employer and an officer acknowledged that the employee was entitled to an ownership interest in an office building, but it was disputed how much of an interest the employee was entitled to; the terms of the oral agreement regarding the interest were sufficiently definite to be enforced, and the matter was not barred by O.C.G.A. §13-5-31(3) because the employer and the officer offered a certain ownership percentage and a buyback value, which constituted part performance, and an issue remained as to whether their actions were inconsistent with the absence of a contract. Fay v. Custom One Homes, LLC, 276 Ga. App. 188, 622 S.E.2d 870, 2005 Ga. App. LEXIS 1200 (2005).

Part performance not applicable. —

In a case in which a bank ceased efforts to foreclose on real estate securing borrowers’ and guarantors’ notes evidencing obligations to the bank, and sued the borrowers and guarantors on the notes, it was error to apply the “part performance” exception to the statute of frauds, O.C.G.A. §13-5-31(3), in holding that the guarantors were estopped from asserting a statute of frauds defense against the bank because the bank’s extension of credit was not partial performance proving the identity of the notes or the debtors thereon. Tampa Inv. Group, Inc. v. Branch Banking & Trust Co., 290 Ga. 724, 723 S.E.2d 674, 2012 Ga. LEXIS 300 (2012).

Part performance will not render contract enforceable against county board of education. —

Since a county board of education is a political body, and has no power other than that conferred by statutory authority, no contract made by the board which is illegal and invalid because the contract is not in writing as required by statute is enforceable against board, notwithstanding part performance by opposite party thereto. Dodd v. Board of Educ., 46 Ga. App. 235, 167 S.E. 319, 1933 Ga. App. LEXIS 5 (1933).

Part payment insufficient. —

Even in oral contract of purchase and sale, part payment of purchase money, without more, will not entitle purchaser to specific performance. Neely v. Sheppard, 185 Ga. 771, 196 S.E. 452, 1938 Ga. LEXIS 518 (1938).

Part payment and possession may be sufficient. —

While payment of part of purchase money is not alone such part performance as will take case out of statute of frauds, if accompanied by possession it will amount to such part performance as to take contract out of statute. Wimberly v. Bryan, 55 Ga. 198, 1875 Ga. LEXIS 378 (1875); Corbin v. Durden, 126 Ga. 429, 55 S.E. 30, 1906 Ga. LEXIS 396 (1906); Harris v. Underwood, 208 Ga. 247, 66 S.E.2d 332, 1951 Ga. LEXIS 341 (1951); Sikes v. Sims, 212 Ga. 391, 93 S.E.2d 6, 1956 Ga. LEXIS 380 (1956).

Receipt of part of purchase money is not such part performance as will take case out of statute; it is only in cases where part payment of purchase money is accompanied by possession that it will amount to part performance as will take contract out of statute. Pierce v. Rush, 210 Ga. 718, 82 S.E.2d 649, 1954 Ga. LEXIS 420 (1954); Sellers v. Hall, 153 Ga. App. 189, 265 S.E.2d 81, 1980 Ga. App. LEXIS 1739 (1980).

Part payment of purchase money alone, unaccompanied by possession of property, is not such part performance of contract as will render it fraud of party refusing to comply, if court did not compel performance. Powell v. Adderholdt, 230 Ga. 211, 196 S.E.2d 420, 1973 Ga. LEXIS 861 (1973).

While payment of a part of the purchase-money is not alone such part performance as will take the case out of the statute of frauds, partial payment of the purchase-money accompanied with possession will amount to such part performance as to take the contract out of the statute and to authorize the specific performance of a parol contract. Smith v. Cox, 247 Ga. 563, 277 S.E.2d 512, 1981 Ga. LEXIS 803 (1981).

Partial payment of the purchase price, unaccompanied by possession or valuable improvements, does not meet the test of part performance. Thus, when the owner of a welding shop, after receiving a down payment, sold the owner’s supplies, which were not wanted by the prospective purchaser, to third parties, this was not such a partial performance of the oral agreement as would remove the agreement from the statute of frauds. Zappa v. Basden, 188 Ga. App. 472, 373 S.E.2d 246, 1988 Ga. App. LEXIS 1074 (1988).

Evidence of oral agreement to pay a sum representing equitable holding in property was not inadmissible under O.C.G.A. §13-5-30 as it was specifically exempted by both subsection (2) as an agreement upon which conveyance of the property had been based and by subsection (3) as a conveyance constituting part performance. Kolb v. Holmes, 207 Ga. App. 184, 427 S.E.2d 562, 1993 Ga. App. LEXIS 122 (1993).

Part performance of an otherwise unenforceable contract does not entitle party to specific performance. —

Trial court erred in finding that a lease-purchase agreement was enforceable because, though the agreement satisfied the statute of frauds, the agreement was invalid for failure of consideration in that the lessee/proposed purchaser never paid the rent owed nor any of the property taxes, which not only invalidated the agreement but voided the purchase option under O.C.G.A. §13-1-8(a). Further, the trial court erred in holding that the lessee/proposed purchaser was entitled to specific performance of the agreement based on repairs made since there was no legal authority to support the trial court’s proposition that part performance of an otherwise unenforceable written agreement, as modified by subsequent oral agreements between the parties, transformed the agreement into an enforceable parol contract. Estate of Ryan v. Shuman, 288 Ga. App. 868, 655 S.E.2d 644, 2007 Ga. App. LEXIS 1264 (2007), cert. denied, No. S08C0664, 2008 Ga. LEXIS 482 (Ga. May 19, 2008).

Part performance as will allow specific performance of parol contract to sell land. —

Specific performance of executory parol contract for sale of land will be decreed in only two instances. One is where defendant admits contract. The other is where it is so far executed by party seeking relief that if contract be abandoned the party cannot be restored to the party’s former position. Full payment alone, accepted by vendor, or partial payment accompanied with possession, or possession alone with valuable improvements, if clearly proved in each case to be done with reference to parol contract, will be sufficient part performance to justify decree. Neely v. Sheppard, 185 Ga. 771, 196 S.E. 452, 1938 Ga. LEXIS 518 (1938).

Because a contractor’s performance and an owner’s acceptance of that performance satisfied the requirements of the statute of frauds, O.C.G.A. §13-5-31, and the plats and deeds established the requisite description of the properties to be exchanged, the contractor was entitled to specific performance under O.C.G.A. §23-2-131(a). Masters v. Redwine, 279 Ga. 432, 615 S.E.2d 118, 2005 Ga. LEXIS 443 (2005).

Part performance not established. —

Sellers were properly granted summary judgment in an action filed by a buyer arising out of an oral land sales contract, given that: (1) no evidence of the buyer’s partial performance existed sufficient to remove the contract from the statute of frauds; (2) a wetlands study and interest rate negotiation were not a part of the contract; and (3) a later negotiated contract was an arm’s length transaction, the price of which was negotiated at the time, and hence, did not relate to the original contract. Payne v. Warren, 282 Ga. App. 524, 639 S.E.2d 528, 2006 Ga. App. LEXIS 1452 (2006), cert. denied, No. S07C0524, 2007 Ga. LEXIS 287 (Ga. Mar. 26, 2007).